Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-308.01
Gross profit, defined.

Gross profit shall mean the definite profit from the sale of a pickle card unit less any commission paid by a licensed organization to a pickle card operator selling individual pickle cards on behalf of the licensed organization.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 10.